Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 9. Involuntary Admission for Treatment.

Sec. 47.30.700.
Initial involuntary commitment procedures.

Upon petition of any adult, a judge shall immediately conduct a screening investigation or direct a local mental health professional employed by the department or by a local mental health program that receives money from the department under AS

47.30.520

—

47.30.620

or another mental health professional designated by the judge, to conduct a screening investigation of the person alleged to be mentally ill and, as a result of that condition, alleged to be gravely disabled or to present a likelihood of serious harm to self or others. Within 48 hours after the completion of the screening investigation, a judge may issue an ex parte order orally or in writing, stating that there is probable cause to believe the respondent is mentally ill and that condition causes the respondent to be gravely disabled or to present a likelihood of serious harm to self or others. The court shall provide findings on which the conclusion is based, appoint an attorney to represent the respondent, and may direct that a peace officer take the respondent into custody and deliver the respondent to the nearest appropriate facility for emergency examination or treatment. The ex parte order shall be provided to the respondent and made a part of the respondent’s clinical record. The court shall confirm an oral order in writing within 24 hours after it is issued.

The petition required in (a) of this section must allege that the respondent is reasonably believed to present a likelihood of serious harm to self or others or is gravely disabled as a result of mental illness and must specify the factual information on which that belief is based including the names and addresses of all persons known to the petitioner who have knowledge of those facts through personal observation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 47.30.705.
Emergency detention for evaluation.

A peace officer, a psychiatrist or physician who is licensed to practice in this state or employed by the federal government, or a clinical psychologist licensed by the state Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners who has probable cause to believe that a person is gravely disabled or is suffering from mental illness and is likely to cause serious harm to self or others of such immediate nature that considerations of safety do not allow initiation of involuntary commitment procedures set out in AS

47.30.700

, may cause the person to be taken into custody and delivered to the nearest crisis stabilization center as defined in AS

47.32.900

or the nearest evaluation facility. A person taken into custody for emergency evaluation may not be placed in a jail or other correctional facility except for protective custody purposes and only while awaiting transportation to a crisis stabilization center or treatment facility. However, emergency protective custody under this section may not include placement of a minor in a jail or secure facility. The peace officer or mental health professional shall complete an application for examination of the person in custody and be interviewed by a mental health professional at the crisis stabilization center, evaluation facility, or treatment facility.

In this section, “minor” means an individual who is under 18 years of age.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 8 ch 142 SLA 1984; am §§ 3, 4 ch 95 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 28 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners” was substituted for “Psychologists and Psychological Examiners” to correct a manifest error.

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for evaluations conducted by evaluation personnel, see 7 AAC 72, art. 7.

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective June 26, 2004, inserted the next-to-last sentence in subsection (a), and added subsection (b).

The 2020 amendment, effective July 28, 2020, in (a), inserted “crisis stabilization center as defined in AS

47.32.900

or the nearest” near the end of the first sentence, inserted “crisis stabilization center or” following “awaiting transportation to a” near the end of the second sentence, and “crisis stabilization center, evaluation facility, or treatment” near the end of the last sentence.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 95, SLA 2004 (SB 340), proposing legislation conforming the state’s juvenile detention laws with federal requirements set out in the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 2003, see 2004 Senate Journal 2184.

Sec. 47.30.710.
Examination; hospitalization.

A respondent who is delivered under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.705

to an evaluation facility, except for delivery to a crisis stabilization center as defined in AS

47.32.900

, for emergency examination and treatment shall be examined and evaluated as to mental and physical condition by a mental health professional and by a physician within 24 hours after arrival at the facility. A respondent who is delivered under AS

47.30.705

to a crisis stabilization center shall be examined by a mental health professional as defined in AS

47.30.915

within three hours after arriving at the center.

If the mental health professional who performs the emergency examination has reason to believe that the respondent is (1) mentally ill and that condition causes the respondent to be gravely disabled or to present a likelihood of serious harm to self or others, and (2) is in need of care or treatment, the mental health professional may hospitalize the respondent, or arrange for hospitalization, on an emergency basis. If a judicial order has not been obtained under AS

47.30.700

, the mental health professional shall apply for an ex parte order authorizing hospitalization for evaluation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 5 ch 28 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1981, the word “respondent” was substituted for “person” in (b)(1) of this section to correct a manifest error in § 1, ch. 84, SLA 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for emergency examinations, see 7 AAC 72, art. 4.

For procedures for evaluations conducted by evaluation personnel, see 7 AAC 72, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective July 28, 2020, in (a), inserted “, except for delivery to a crisis stabilization center as defined in AS

47.32.900

,” following “an evaluation facility”, and added the second sentence.

Sec. 47.30.715.
Procedure after order.

When a facility receives a proper order for evaluation, it shall accept the order and the respondent for an evaluation period not to exceed 72 hours.
The facility shall promptly notify the court of the date and time of the respondent’s arrival.
The court shall set a date, time, and place for a 30-day commitment hearing, to be held if needed within 72 hours after the respondent’s arrival, and the court shall notify the facility, the respondent, the respondent’s attorney, and the prosecuting attorney of the hearing arrangements.
Evaluation personnel, when used, shall similarly notify the court of the date and time when they first met with the respondent.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 9 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for evaluations, see 7 AAC 72, art. 5.

For procedures for evaluations conducted by evaluation personnel, see 7 AAC 72, art. 7.

Sec. 47.30.720.
Release before expiration of 72-hour period.

If at any time in the course of the 72-hour period the mental health professionals conducting the evaluation determine that the respondent does not meet the standards for commitment specified in AS

47.30.700

, the respondent shall be discharged from the facility or the place of evaluation by evaluation personnel and the petitioner and the court so notified.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for evaluations, see 7 AAC 72, art. 5.

Sec. 47.30.725.
Rights; notification.

When a respondent is detained for evaluation under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

, the respondent shall be immediately notified orally and in writing of the rights under this section. Notification must be in a language understood by the respondent. The respondent’s guardian, if any, and if the respondent requests, an adult designated by the respondent, shall also be notified of the respondent’s rights under this section.

Unless a respondent is released or voluntarily admitted for treatment within 72 hours of arrival at the facility or, if the respondent is evaluated by evaluation personnel, within 72 hours from the beginning of the respondent’s meeting with evaluation personnel, the respondent is entitled to a court hearing to be set for not later than the end of that 72-hour period to determine whether there is cause for detention after the 72 hours have expired for up to an additional 30 days on the grounds that the respondent is mentally ill, and as a result presents a likelihood of serious harm to the respondent or others, or is gravely disabled. The facility or evaluation personnel shall give notice to the court of the releases and voluntary admissions under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.815

.

The respondent has a right to communicate immediately, at the department’s expense, with the respondent’s guardian, if any, or an adult designated by the respondent and the attorney designated in the ex parte order, or an attorney of the respondent’s choice.

The respondent has the right to be represented by an attorney, to present evidence, and to cross-examine witnesses who testify against the respondent at the hearing.

The respondent has the right to be free of the effects of medication and other forms of treatment to the maximum extent possible before the 30-day commitment hearing; however, the facility or evaluation personnel may treat the respondent with medication under prescription by a licensed physician or by a less restrictive alternative of the respondent’s preference if, in the opinion of a licensed physician in the case of medication, or of a mental health professional in the case of alternative treatment, the treatment is necessary to

prevent bodily harm to the respondent or others;

prevent such deterioration of the respondent’s mental condition that subsequent treatment might not enable the respondent to recover; or

allow the respondent to prepare for and participate in the proceedings.

A respondent, if represented by counsel, may waive, orally or in writing, the 72-hour time limit on the 30-day commitment hearing and have the hearing set for a date no more than seven calendar days after arrival at the facility. The respondent’s counsel shall immediately notify the court of the waiver.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 10 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.730.
Petition for 30-day commitment.

In the course of the 72-hour evaluation period, a petition for commitment to a treatment facility may be filed in court. The petition must be signed by two mental health professionals who have examined the respondent, one of whom is a physician. The petition must

allege that the respondent is mentally ill and as a result is likely to cause harm to self or others or is gravely disabled;

allege that the evaluation staff has considered but has not found that there are any less restrictive alternatives available that would adequately protect the respondent or others; or, if a less restrictive involuntary form of treatment is sought, specify the treatment and the basis for supporting it;

allege with respect to a gravely disabled respondent that there is reason to believe that the respondent’s mental condition could be improved by the course of treatment sought;

allege that a specified treatment facility or less restrictive alternative that is appropriate to the respondent’s condition has agreed to accept the respondent;

allege that the respondent has been advised of the need for, but has not accepted, voluntary treatment, and request that the court commit the respondent to the specified treatment facility or less restrictive alternative for a period not to exceed 30 days;

list the prospective witnesses who will testify in support of commitment or involuntary treatment; and

list the facts and specific behavior of the respondent supporting the allegation in (1) of this subsection.

A copy of the petition shall be served on the respondent, the respondent’s attorney, and the respondent’s guardian, if any, before the 30-day commitment hearing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 11 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for emergency examinations, see 7 AAC 72, art. 4.

For procedures for evaluations, see 7 AAC 72, art. 5.

Sec. 47.30.735.
30-day commitment; hearing.

Upon receipt of a proper petition for commitment, the court shall hold a hearing at the date and time previously specified according to procedures set out in AS

47.30.715

.

The hearing shall be conducted in a physical setting least likely to have a harmful effect on the mental or physical health of the respondent, within practical limits. At the hearing, in addition to other rights specified in AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

, the respondent has the right

to be present at the hearing; this right may be waived only with the respondent’s informed consent; if the respondent is incapable of giving informed consent, the respondent may be excluded from the hearing only if the court, after hearing, finds that the incapacity exists and that there is a substantial likelihood that the respondent’s presence at the hearing would be severely injurious to the respondent’s mental or physical health;

to view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file of the respondent’s case;

to have the hearing open or closed to the public as the respondent elects;

to have the rules of evidence and civil procedure applied so as to provide for the informal but efficient presentation of evidence;

to have an interpreter if the respondent does not understand English;

to present evidence on the respondent’s behalf;

to cross-examine witnesses who testify against the respondent;

to remain silent;

to call experts and other witnesses to testify on the respondent’s behalf.

At the conclusion of the hearing the court may commit the respondent to a treatment facility for not more than 30 days if it finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the respondent is mentally ill and as a result is likely to cause harm to the respondent or others or is gravely disabled.

If the court finds that there is a viable less restrictive alternative available and that the respondent has been advised of and refused voluntary treatment through the alternative, the court may order the less restrictive alternative treatment for not more than 30 days if the program accepts the respondent.

The court shall specifically state to the respondent, and give the respondent written notice, that if commitment or other involuntary treatment beyond the 30 days is to be sought, the respondent has the right to a full hearing or jury trial.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 12 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.740.
Procedure for 90-day commitment following 30-day commitment.

At any time during the respondent’s 30-day commitment, the professional person in charge, or that person’s professional designee, may file with the court a petition for a 90-day commitment of that respondent. The petition must include all material required under AS

47.30.730(a)

except that references to “30 days” shall be read as “90 days”; and

allege that the respondent has attempted to inflict or has inflicted serious bodily harm upon the respondent or another since the respondent’s acceptance for evaluation, or that the respondent was committed initially as a result of conduct in which the respondent attempted or inflicted serious bodily harm upon the respondent or another, or that the respondent continues to be gravely disabled, or that the respondent demonstrates a current intent to carry out plans of serious harm to the respondent or another;

allege that the respondent has received appropriate and adequate care and treatment during the respondent’s 30-day commitment;

be verified by the professional person in charge, or that person’s professional designee, during the 30-day commitment.

The court shall have copies of the petition for 90-day commitment served upon the respondent, the respondent’s attorney, and the respondent’s guardian, if any. The petition for 90-day commitment and proofs of service shall be filed with the clerk of the court, and a date for hearing shall be set, by the end of the next judicial day, for not later than five judicial days from the date of filing of the petition. The clerk shall notify the respondent, the respondent’s attorney, and the petitioner of the hearing date at least three judicial days in advance of the hearing.

Findings of fact relating to the respondent’s behavior made at a 30-day commitment hearing under AS

47.30.735

shall be admitted as evidence and may not be rebutted except that newly discovered evidence may be used for the purpose of rebutting the findings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 13 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.745.
90-day commitment hearing rights; continued commitment.

A respondent subject to a petition for 90-day commitment has, in addition to the rights specified elsewhere in this chapter, or otherwise applicable, the rights enumerated in this section. Written notice of these rights shall be served on the respondent and the respondent’s attorney and guardian, if any, and may be served on an adult designated by the respondent at the time the petition for 90-day commitment is served. An attempt shall be made by oral explanation to ensure that the respondent understands the rights enumerated in the notice. If the respondent does not understand English, the explanation shall be given in a language the respondent understands.

Unless the respondent is released or is admitted voluntarily following the filing of a petition and before the hearing, the respondent is entitled to a judicial hearing within five judicial days of the filing of the petition as set out in AS

47.30.740(b)

to determine if the respondent is mentally ill and as a result is likely to cause harm to self or others, or if the respondent is gravely disabled. If the respondent is admitted voluntarily following the filing of the petition, the voluntary admission constitutes a waiver of any hearing rights under AS

47.30.740

or under AS

47.30.685

. If at any time during the respondent’s voluntary admission under this subsection, the respondent submits to the facility a written request to leave, the professional person in charge may file with the court a petition for a 180-day commitment of the respondent under AS

47.30.770

. The 180-day commitment hearing shall be scheduled for a date not later than 90 days after the respondent’s voluntary admission.

The respondent is entitled to a jury trial upon request filed with the court if the request is made at least two judicial days before the hearing. If the respondent requests a jury trial, the hearing may be continued for no more than 10 calendar days. The jury shall consist of six persons.

If a jury trial is not requested, the court may still continue the hearing at the respondent’s request for no more than 10 calendar days.

The respondent has a right to retain an independent licensed physician or other mental health professional to examine the respondent and to testify on the respondent’s behalf. Upon request by an indigent respondent, the court shall appoint an independent licensed physician or other mental health professional to examine the respondent and testify on the respondent’s behalf. The court shall consider an indigent respondent’s request for a specific physician or mental health professional. A motion for the appointment may be filed in court at any reasonable time before the hearing and shall be acted upon promptly. Reasonable fees and expenses for expert examiners shall be determined by the rules of court.

The proceeding shall in all respects be in accord with constitutional guarantees of due process and, except as otherwise specifically provided in AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.915

, the rules of evidence and procedure in civil proceedings.

Until the court issues a final decision, the respondent shall continue to be treated at the treatment facility unless the petition for 90-day commitment is withdrawn. If a decision has not been made within 20 days of filing of the petition, not including extensions of time due to jury trial or other requests by the respondent, the respondent shall be released.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 14 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.750.
Conduct of hearing.

The hearing under AS

47.30.745

shall be conducted in the same manner, and with the same rights for the respondent, as set out in AS

47.30.735(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1981, “under AS

47.30.745

” was inserted following “hearing” in this section to correct an oversight in § 1, ch. 84, SLA 1981.

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Mentally Impaired Persons, § 23 et seq.

56 C.J.S., Mental Health, § 1 et seq.

Right to counsel in insanity or incompetency adjudication proceedings. 87 ALR2d 950.

Modern status of rules as to standard of proof required in civil commitment proceedings. 97 ALR3d 780.

Sec. 47.30.755.
Court order.

After the hearing and within the time limit specified in AS

47.30.745

, the court may commit the respondent to a treatment facility for no more than 90 days if the court or jury finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is mentally ill and as a result is likely to cause harm to self or others, or is gravely disabled.

If the court finds that there is a less restrictive alternative available and that the respondent has been advised of and refused voluntary treatment through the alternative, the court may order the less restrictive alternative treatment after acceptance by the program of the respondent for a period not to exceed 90 days.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.760.
Placement at closest facility.

Treatment shall always be available at a state-operated hospital; however, if space is available and upon acceptance by another treatment facility, a respondent who is committed by the court shall be placed by the department at the designated treatment facility closest to the respondent’s home unless the court finds that

another treatment facility in the state has a program more suited to the respondent’s condition, and this interest outweighs the desirability of the respondent being closer to home;

another treatment facility in the state is closer to the respondent’s friends or relatives who could benefit the respondent through their visits and communications; or

the respondent wants to be further removed from home, and the mental health professionals who sought the respondent’s commitment concur in the desirability of removed placement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.765.
Appeal.

The respondent has the right to an appeal from an order of involuntary commitment.
The court shall inform the respondent of this right.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.770.
Additional 180-day commitment.

The respondent shall be released from involuntary treatment at the expiration of 90 days unless the professional person in charge files a petition for a 180-day commitment conforming to the requirements of AS

47.30.740(a)

except that all references to “30-day commitment” shall be read as “the previous 90-day commitment” and all references to “90-day commitment” shall be read as “180-day commitment”.

The procedures for service of the petition, notification of rights, and judicial hearing shall be as set out in AS

47.30.740

—

47.30.750

. If the court or jury finds by clear and convincing evidence that the grounds for 90-day commitment as set out in AS

47.30.755

are present, the court may order the respondent committed for an additional treatment period not to exceed 180 days from the date on which the first 90-day treatment period would have expired.

Successive 180-day commitments are permissible on the same ground and under the same procedures as the original 180-day commitment. An order of commitment may not exceed 180 days.

Findings of fact relating to the respondent’s behavior made at a 30-day commitment hearing under AS

47.30.735

, a 90-day commitment hearing under AS

47.30.750

, or a previous 180-day commitment hearing under this section shall be admitted as evidence and may not be rebutted except that newly discovered evidence may be used for the purpose of rebutting the findings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 15 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.772.
Medication and treatment.

An evaluation facility or designated treatment facility may administer medication or other treatment to an involuntarily committed patient only in a manner that is consistent with the provisions of AS

47.30.817

—

47.30.865

.

History.

(§ 16 ch 142 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 109 SLA 1992; am § 76 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, substituted “AS

47.30.817

—

47.30.865

” for “AS

47.30.825

—

47.30.865

”.

Sec. 47.30.775.
Commitment of minors.

The provisions of AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.815

apply to minors. However, all notices required to be served on the respondent in AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.815

shall also be served on the parent or guardian of a respondent who is a minor, and parents or guardians of a minor respondent shall be notified that they may appear as parties in any commitment proceeding concerning the minor and that as parties they are entitled to retain their own attorney or have the office of public advocacy appointed for them by the court.
A minor respondent has the same rights to waiver and informed consent as an adult respondent under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

; however, the minor shall be represented by counsel in waiver and consent proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 18 ch 55 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.780.
Early discharge.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, the professional person in charge shall at any time discharge a respondent on the ground that the respondent is no longer gravely disabled or likely to cause serious harm as a result of mental illness. A certificate to this effect shall be sent to the court, which shall enter an order officially terminating the involuntary commitment.

The professional person in charge shall give the prosecuting authority 10 days’ notice before discharging a respondent who was committed after having been found incompetent to proceed under AS

12.47.110

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am §§ 36, 37 ch 75 SLA 2008)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective July 1, 2008, added “Except as provided in (b) of this section” at the beginning, and added subsection (b).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 43(d), ch. 75, SLA 2008, provides that the 2008 amendment of (a) and enactment of (b) of this section “apply to procedures occurring after July 1, 2008, regardless of whether the offense occurred before, on, or after, July 1, 2008.”

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008 explicitly declares that secs. 36 and 37, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending (a) and enacting (b) of this section, are subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 47.30.785.
Authorized absences.

A respondent undergoing involuntary treatment on an inpatient basis under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.815

may be authorized to be absent from the treatment facility during times specified by the professional person in charge, or that person’s professional designee, when an authorization to be absent is in the best interests of the respondent and the respondent is not likely to cause harm to self or others.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.790.
Unauthorized absences: return to facility; required notice.

When a respondent undergoing involuntary treatment on an inpatient basis is absent from the treatment facility without, or in excess of, authorization under AS

47.30.785

, the professional person in charge, or that person’s professional designee, may contact the appropriate peace officers who shall take the respondent into custody and return the respondent to the treatment facility.
If it is determined by the professional person in charge to be necessary, a member of the treatment facility staff shall accompany the peace officers when they take the respondent into custody.
In addition, the family or guardian of the patient and any person known to have been threatened by the patient shall be notified of the patient’s unauthorized absence immediately upon its discovery.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 17 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.795.
Involuntary outpatient care for committed persons.

A respondent who was originally committed to involuntary inpatient care under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.915

may be released before the expiration of the commitment period if a provider of outpatient care accepts the respondent for specified outpatient treatment for a period of time not to exceed the duration of the commitment, and if the professional person in charge, or that person’s professional designee, finds that

it is not necessary to treat the respondent as an inpatient to prevent the respondent from harming self or others; and

there is reason to believe that the respondent’s mental condition would improve as a result of the outpatient treatment.

A copy of the conditions for early release shall be given to the respondent and the respondent’s attorney and guardian, if any, the provider of outpatient care, and the court.

If during the commitment period the provider of outpatient care determines that the respondent can no longer be treated on an outpatient basis because the respondent is likely to cause harm to self or others or is gravely disabled, the provider shall give the respondent oral and written notice that the respondent must return to the treatment facility within 24 hours, with copies to the respondent’s attorney and guardian, if any, the court, and the inpatient treatment facility. If the respondent fails to arrive at the treatment facility within 24 hours after receiving the notice, the professional person in charge may contact the appropriate peace officers who shall take the respondent into custody and transport the respondent to the facility. If it is determined by the professional person in charge to be necessary, a member of the treatment facility staff shall accompany the peace officers when they take the respondent into custody.

If the provider of outpatient care determines that the respondent will require continued outpatient care after the expiration of the commitment period, the provider may initiate further commitment proceedings as if the provider were the professional person in charge, and the provisions of AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

apply, except that provisions relating to inpatient treatment shall be read as applicable to outpatient treatment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.800.
Conversion of involuntary outpatient treatment to inpatient commitment.

A respondent ordered by the court under the provisions of AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.915

to receive involuntary outpatient treatment may be required to undergo inpatient treatment when the provider of outpatient care finds that (1) the respondent is mentally ill and is likely to cause serious harm to self or others or is still gravely disabled; (2) the respondent’s behavior since the hearing resulting in court-ordered treatment indicates that the respondent now needs inpatient treatment to protect self or others; (3) there is reason to believe that the respondent’s mental condition will improve as a result of inpatient treatment; and (4) there is an inpatient facility appropriate to the respondent’s need that will accept the respondent as a patient. Treatment for these respondents shall be available at state-operated hospitals at all times.

Upon making the findings specified in (a) of this section, the provisions of AS

47.30.795(c)

relating to notice and AS

47.30.745

relating to hearings apply.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 109 SLA 1992)

Sec. 47.30.803.
Conversion from involuntary to voluntary status.

A patient subject to involuntary hospitalization under AS

47.30.705

,

47.30.735

, or AS

47.30.755

may at any time convert to voluntary status if the responsible physician agrees that

the patient is an appropriate patient for voluntary hospitalization; and

the conversion is made in good faith.

History.

(§ 18 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.805.
Computation, extension, and expiration of periods of time.

Except as provided in (b) of this section,

computations of a 72-hour evaluation period under AS

47.30.715

or a 48-hour detention period under AS

47.30.685

do not include Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, or any period of time necessary to transport the respondent to the treatment facility;

a 30-day commitment period expires at the end of the 30th day after the 72 hours following initial acceptance;

a 90-day commitment period expires at the end of the 90th day after the expiration of a 30-day period of treatment;

a 180-day commitment period expires at the end of the 180th day, after the expiration of a 90-day period of treatment or previous 180-day period, whichever is applicable.

When a respondent has failed to appear or been absent through the respondent’s own actions contrary to any order properly made or entered under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

, the relevant commitment period shall be extended for a period of time equal to the respondent’s absence if written notice of absence is promptly provided to the respondent’s attorney and guardian, if there is one, and if, within 24 hours after the respondent has returned to the evaluation or treatment facility, written notice of the corresponding extension and the reason for it is given to the respondent and the respondent’s attorney and guardian, if any, and to the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 19 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.810.
Habeas corpus not limited.

Nothing in AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

may be construed as limiting a person’s right to a writ of habeas corpus.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.815.
Limitation of liability; bad faith application a felony.

A person acting in good faith upon either actual knowledge or reliable information who makes application for evaluation or treatment of another person under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.915

is not subject to civil or criminal liability.

The following persons may not be held civilly or criminally liable for detaining a person under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.915

or for releasing a person under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.915

at or before the end of the period for which the person was admitted or committed for evaluation or treatment if the persons have performed their duties in good faith and without gross negligence:

an officer of a public or private agency;

the superintendent, the professional person in charge, the professional designee of the professional person in charge, and the attending staff of a public or private agency;

a public official performing functions necessary to the administration of AS 47.30.700 — 47.30.915;

a peace officer or mental health professional responsible for detaining or transporting a person under AS 47.30.700 — 47.30.915.

A person who wilfully initiates an involuntary commitment procedure under AS

47.30.700

without having good cause to believe that the other person is suffering from a mental illness and as a result is gravely disabled or likely to cause serious harm to self or others, is guilty of a felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 20 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

For classification of the offense set out in (c) of this section as a class C felony, see AS

11.81.250(b)

; for penalties for class C felonies, see AS

12.55.035(b)(4)

and

12.55.125(e)

.